Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.092] CLIMATE LITERACY SEAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Climate literacy" means an understanding of the essential principles of the earth's climate system, assessing scientifically credible climate information, learning to communicate about the climate in a meaningful manner, and making informed and responsible decisions regarding actions that may affect the climate. new text end new text begin (c) "Climate literacy experiential learning provider" means a provider that facilitates a student's final project. A provider may include a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2; school organization or club; or local media outlet, business, nonprofit organization, or industry focused on green skills or technical green skills. new text end new text begin (d) "Climate literacy final experiential learning project" or "final project" means a student project that focuses on the effects of climate change in the student's local community and that the student successfully completes as part of the requirements necessary to receive a seal of climate literacy. new text end new text begin (e) "Green jobs" means occupations or employment positions that reduce harmful effects on the climate; adapt processes to minimize their effect on the climate; recognize and mitigate the disproportionate social effects of climate change; support the social economic, social, and environmental sustainability of communities; or contribute to the well-being and resilience of present and future generations. new text end new text begin (f) "Green skills" means the knowledge, abilities, values, and attitudes to live in, develop, and support a sustainable and resource-efficient society. new text end new text begin (g) "Participating school" means a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, that grants a seal of climate literacy to a student who demonstrates mastery in climate literacy in accordance with this section. new text end new text begin (h) "Technical green skills" means skills that fulfill the requirements of green jobs and support the transition to a low-carbon sustainable economy. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Climate literacy seal established. new text end new text begin A voluntary climate literacy seal is established to recognize graduating high school students in any school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, who demonstrate mastery in climate literacy disciplines and attain green skills or technical green skills by successfully completing the requirements under this section. The purpose of the climate literacy seal is to give a student personal agency to understand or adapt to the effects of climate change. Participation for a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit to offer a climate literacy seal is voluntary. A participating school must notate the appropriate seal on the transcript of each high school student who meets the requirements of this section and may affix the seal to the student's diploma. A participating school must not charge the high school student a fee for this seal. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Student requirements. new text end new text begin (a) To obtain a climate literacy seal, a student must: new text end new text begin (1) meet the minimum high school graduation requirements under this chapter and all other locally adopted graduation requirements; new text end new text begin (2) successfully complete at least two approved courses in the area of climate literacy; and new text end new text begin (3) obtain approval for a climate literacy final experiential learning project proposal in accordance with the participating school's procedures and successfully complete the final project. new text end new text begin (b) A student who wishes to obtain a climate literacy seal must notify the participating school in accordance with school procedures for awarding a climate literacy seal and seek approval for the student's final experiential learning project proposal. new text end new text begin (c) The final experiential learning project proposal may include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a capstone project centered on the student's community and the community's effect on climate change; new text end new text begin (2) a field experience or practicum related to the approved coursework; new text end new text begin (3) an internship, externship, or employment with a climate literacy experiential learning provider; new text end new text begin (4) one or more community projects with a climate literacy experiential learning provider; new text end new text begin (5) hands-on laboratory experiments; new text end new text begin (6) original artwork or writing; or new text end new text begin (7) student-designed and student-led programming that has an effect on the student's community and other students. new text end new text begin (d) To successfully complete the final project, a student must demonstrate an academic understanding of climate literacy through the practical application of climate literacy principles that address local climate issues in the student's community. The student must present the final project to an individual or group identified and selected by the climate literacy experiential learning provider or participating school. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Workforce. new text end new text begin A participating school may collaborate with local businesses, nonprofit organizations, and industry leaders identified by the participating school within the surrounding community who are interested in climate literacy and building a workforce with technical green skills. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin School requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, must determine prior to the beginning of each school year whether it will offer the climate literacy seal. new text end new text begin (b) A participating school must annually provide students enrolled in grades six through 12 and their legal guardians with information about the literacy seal, including the requirements for obtaining a climate literacy seal and a list of approved courses in the area of climate literacy. Approved courses may include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) high school courses or qualified advanced placement courses that cover physical science, life science, or earth science; and new text end new text begin (2) courses provided under section 124D.09, career and technical education courses, or school courses that integrate the climate literacy principles. new text end new text begin (c) A participating school must either evaluate for approval a student's final project proposal or authorize a climate literacy experiential learning provider to facilitate, support, and evaluate for approval a student's final project proposal before the student begins the final project. new text end new text begin (d) By July 1, 2027, and by July 1 each year thereafter, each participating school must collect data on climate literacy seal participation, including: new text end new text begin (1) each school site where an enrolled student was awarded a climate literacy seal; new text end new text begin (2) the number of students who received a climate literacy seal; new text end new text begin (3) the types of final experiential learning projects students completed; new text end new text begin (4) the names of the climate literacy experiential learning providers that approved, supported, and facilitated students' projects; new text end new text begin (5) a list of academic courses students completed to earn the climate literacy seal; and new text end new text begin (6) other relevant information related to the climate literacy seal requested by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) A participating school must submit an annual report to the commissioner of education in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, including the data collected under this subdivision. The report is due by October 1, 2027, and by October 1 of each year thereafter. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Department of Education; report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2028, and by January 15 each year thereafter, the commissioner must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education evaluating and summarizing the data submitted by participating schools under subdivision 5. The commissioner may collaborate with a nonprofit organization that works with schools, industry leaders, and institutions of higher education that support students' climate literacy to evaluate the data and prepare the report. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end